Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7015
Limitation on new applications.

There shall be no new applications filed under the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act after December 31, 2029. All applications and all tax credits pending or approved before such date shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB937, § 82.